Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.651

Conservator—Authorized actions—Costs.

(1) As authorized by RCW 31.12.637, the director may, upon due notice and hearing conducted by the director or the director's designee, appoint a conservator for a credit union. The director may appoint himself or herself or another qualified party as conservator of the credit union. The conservator shall immediately take charge of the credit union and all of its property, books, records, and effects.

(2) The conservator shall conduct the business of the credit union and take such steps toward the removal of the causes and conditions that have necessitated the appointment of a conservator, as the director may direct. The conservator is authorized to, without limitation:

(a) Take all necessary measures to preserve, protect, and recover any assets or property of the credit union, including any claim or cause of action belonging to or which may be asserted by the credit union, and administer the same in his or her own name as conservator; and

(b) File, prosecute, and defend any suit that has been filed or may be filed by or against the credit union that is deemed by the conservator to be necessary to protect all of the interested parties or a property affected thereby.

The conservator shall make such reports to the director from time to time as may be required by the director.

(3) All costs incident to conservatorship will be a charge against the assets of the credit union to be allowed and paid as the director may determine.

(4) If at any time the director determines that the credit union is not in condition to continue business under the conservator in the interest of its share account holders, depositors, or creditors, and grounds exist under RCW 31.12.637, the director may proceed with appointment of a liquidating agent or receiver in accordance with this chapter.

(5) The director, the department and its employees, and third parties acting as conservators are not subject to liability for actions under this section, and no departmental funds may be required to be expended on behalf of the credit union, or its creditors, employees, members, or any other party or entity.

[ 2010 c 87 s 12; 1997 c 397 s 64.]